Hawaii, session 2025, GM1189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 356D-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read as follows:
""Housing" or "housing project" means any home, house,
residence, building, apartment, living quarters, abode,
domicile, or dwelling unit that is designed principally for the
purposes of sheltering people."
SECTION 2. Section 356D-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) The authority may acquire any real or personal
property or interest therein by purchase, exchange, gift, grant,
lease, or other means from any person or government to provide
[pufeiie] housing. Exchange of real property shall be in
accordance with section 171-50."
2. By amending subsection (c) to read:
"(c) The authority may lease or rent all or a portion of
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO 1
IIHHIIIilllllllllilll

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
any housing project and establish and revise the rents
or charges therefor. The authority may sell, exchange,
transfer, assign, or pledge any property, real or personal, or
any interest therein to any person or government."
SECTION 3. Section 356D-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t-lSSSSD-lO[-3-] Agents, including corporations. The
authority may exercise any or all of the powers conferred upon
it, either generally or with respect to any specific [pufeiie]
housing project through an agent that it may designate,
including any corporation that is formed under the laws of this
State, and for those purposes the authority may cause one or
more corporations to be formed under the laws of this State or
may acquire the capital stock of any corporation. Any for
profit corporate agent, all of the stock of which shall be owned
by the authority or its nominee, may to the extent permitted by
law, exercise any of the powers conferred upon the authority in
this chapter."
SECTION 4. Section 356D-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO
IHlIlllillHIIIIIIIIIIBII

Page 3 1093
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"§356D-11 Development of property. (a) The authority, in
its own behalf or on behalf of any government, may:
(1) Clear, improve, and rehabilitate property; and
(2) Plan, develop, construct, and finance housing
projects.
(b) The authority may develop public land in an
agricultural district subject to the prior approval of the land
use commission when developing lands greater than five acres in
size. The authority shall not develop state monuments,
historical sites, or parks. When the authority proposes to
develop public land, it shall file with the department of land
and natural resources a petition setting forth that purpose.
The petition shall be conclusive proof that the intended use is
. a public use superior to that to which the land had been
15' appropriated.
(c) The authority may develop or assist in the development
of federal lands with the approval of appropriate federal
authorities.
(d) The authority shall not develop any public land where
the development may endanger the receipt of any federal grant,
impair the eligibility of any government agency for a federal
• 2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO 3
iiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiiMii

Page 4 1093
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
I grant, prevent the participation of the federal government in
any government program, or impair any covenant between the
government and the holder of any bond issued by the government.
(e) The authority may contract or sponsor with any county,
housing authority, or person, subject to the availability of
funds, housing projects designed to meet the needs of elders,
disabled, displaced or homeless persons, low- and
moderate- income persons, government employees, teachers, or
university and college students and faculty.
(f) The authority may enter into contracts with eligible
developers to develop housing projects in exchange for mixed use
development rights. Eligibility of a developer for an exchange
pursuant to this subsection shall be determined pursuant to
rules adopted by the authority in accordance with chapter 91.
As used in this subsection, "mixed use development rights"
means the right to develop a portion of a housing project for
commercial use.
(g) The authority may develop, with an eligible developer,
or may assist under a government assistance program in the
development of, housing projects. The land planning activities
of the authority shall be coordinated with the county planning
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO
HiiiiiiiHHiniiiniinii

Page 5 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
departments and the county land use plans, policies, and
ordinances.
Any person, if qualified, may act simultaneously as
developer and contractor.
In selecting eligible developers or in contracting any
services or materials for the purposes of this subsection, the
authority shall be subject to all federal procurement laws and
regulations.
For tl^ purposes of this subsection, "government assistance
program" means a housing program qualified by the authority and
administered or operated by the authority or the United States
or any of their political subdivisions, agencies, or
instrumentalities, corporate or otherwise.
(h) In connection with the development of any housing
dwelling units under this chapter, the authority may also
develop commercial properties and industrial properties and sell
or lease other properties if it determines that the uses will be
an integral part of the housing development or a benefit to the
community in which the properties are situated. The authority
may designate any portions of the housing development for
commercial, industrial, or other use and shall have all the
2025-3361 HB1093 GDI HMSO
liiiiiiiiiiiiiiiniBiiiii

Page 6 1093
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
powers granted under this chapter with respect thereto. The
authority may use any funding authorized under this chapter to
implement this subsection.
The net proceeds of all sales or leases, less costs to the
authority, shall be deposited in the public housing special fund
established by section 356D-28.
[-far)-----For purposes of this-soctien-;—
projcot"- meon-s—any home,—house,—reeideftee-?—building^—apartment,
living quart-earS-,—afeede-,—domicile,—or dwelling-anit that io
designed pri-noipally for the purposes of shel-t-ering people.] "
SECTION 5. Section 356D-11.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-F]§356D-11.2 [^-] Ceded lands; vacancy; development.
[-(e-)-] No housing projects developed or constructed pursuant to
this part shall be developed or constructed on ceded land that
is vacant on or after January 1, 2022.
[-(b)-- For the purpooeS' of thio seetaron-,—
shall have the same moaning as that term is defined in section
356D-11-.-] "
SECTION 6. Section 356D—12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO 6
iiiiinniiiiiiiiiiiiHii

Page 7 H.B. NO.
hTi
C.D. 1
"§356D-12 Development of property; additional powers.
[(a)] Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, whenever
the bids submitted for the development or rehabilitation of any
housing project authorized pursuant to this chapter exceed the
amount of funds available for that project, the authority, with
the approval of the governor, may disregard the bids and enter
into an agreement to carry out the project, undertake the
project, or participate in the project under the agreement;
provided that:
(1) The total cost of the agreement and the authority's
participation, if any, shall not exceed the amount of
funds available for the project; and
(2) If the agreement is with a nonbidder, the scope of the
project under agreement shall remain the same as that
for which bids were originally requested.
[-( fej-- For pu-rpoDOO of thio ocction,—"houoing project-"—aha 11
have the oame meaning as ^hat term io-defined in section
356D-11.]"
SECTION 7. Section 356D-12.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO
iiiimiiMiiiiiiiiiiinii

Page 8 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
"§356D-12.5 Development of property; partnership or
development agreement. (a) Any housing project may be
developed under sections 356D-11 and 356D-12 by the authority in
partnership or under a development agreement with a private
party; provided that a written partnership or development
agreement is executed by the authority. At a minimum, the
partnership or development agreement shall provide for:
(1) A determination by the authority that the partnership
or development agreement is for a public purpose; and
(2) Final approval by the authority of the plans and
specifications for the housing project.
(b) For the development of housing projects pursuant to
subsection (a), except as provided by federal law or regulation,
the authority shall not be subject to chapters 103 and 103D or
any and all other requirements of law for competitive bidding
for partnership or development agreements, construction
contracts, or other contracts; provided that the authority shall
develop internal policies and procedures for the procurement of
goods, services, and construction, consistent with the goals of
public accountability and public procurement practices.
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO
IBIIIHIIIillllinilDIIIII

Page 9 H.B. NO. 1093
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(c) The authority shall submit an annual report to the
legislature, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session, on the status of all housing projects
being developed using partnership or development agreements
pursuant to subsection (a).
(d) The authority may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91
necessary for the purposes of this section.
-- For the purposco of this section,—"heuoing project”
shall have the same meaning-as that term defined in section
356D-11.]"
SECTION 8. Section 356D-21, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (d) to read:
"(d) The authority may issue bonds as it may determine,
including without limitation bonds payable from and secured, in
whole or in part, by:
(1) Income and revenues derived from the [pateiie] housing
project or projects financed from the proceeds of
bonds;
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO
niiiiMimoBiniiiHi

Page 10 1093
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D, 1
(2) Receipts derived from any grant from the federal
government made in aid of a [peteiie] housing project
or projects financed from the proceeds of bonds;
(3) Income and revenues derived from a particular
designated [peblic] housing project or projects
<> whether or not financed, in whole or in part, from the
proceeds of bonds;
(4) Income and revenues of the authority generally; or
(5) Any combination of paragraphs (1) through (4)."
2. By amending subsection (f) to read:
"(f) Any [publie] housing project or projects authorized
by, and undertaken pursuant to, this chapter shall constitute an
undertaking within the meaning of that term as
defined and used in part III, chapter 39. The authority shall
constitute a [■Mcpa-rtmcnt"] department and the board shall
constitute a ["governing body-] governing body within the
meaning of those terms as defined and used in part III, chapter
39. "
SECTION 9. Section 356D-22, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO 10
iiniigiiilUiliiiiuiiM

H.B. NO 1093
H.D. 1
■ S,D. 1
C.D. 1
"(b) The authority may include the costs of undertaking
and maintaining any [pufeiie] housing project or projects for
which the bonds are issued in determining the principal amount
of bonds to be issued. In determining the cost of undertaking
and maintaining the [public] housing project, the authority may
include the cost of studies and surveys; insurance premiums;
underwriting fees; financial consultant, legal, accounting, and
other services incurred; reserve account, trustee, custodian,
and rating agency fees; and interest on the bonds for a period
determined by the authority."
SECTION 10. Section 356D-23, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) The trustee shall also be authorized by the authority
to receive and receipt for, hold, and administer the revenues
derived by the authority from any [pubiie] housing project or
projects for which the bonds are issued or the projects pledged
to the payment of the bonds, and to apply the revenues to the
payment of the cost of administering, operating, and maintaining
the [pubiie] housing, project or projects, to pay the principal
of and the interest on the bonds, to the establishment of
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO 11
iiHmiiniiwniiiiiiiH

Page 12
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
reserves, and to other purposes as may be authorized in the
proceedings providing for the issuance of the bonds."
SECTION 11. Section 356D-24, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (b) to read:
"(b) A trust indenture may allow the authority to pledge
and assign to the trustee agreements related to the [public]
housing project or projects and the rights of the authority
thereunder, including the right to receive revenues thereunder
and to enforce the provision thereof."
2. By amending subsections (d) and (e) to read:
"(d) A trust indenture shall also contain provisions as
to:
(1) The investment of the proceeds of the bonds, the
investment of any reserve for the bonds, the
investment of the revenues of the [puteiie] housing
project or system of [pabiie] housing projects, and
the use and application of the earnings from
investments; and
(2) The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the
bonds or any portion of them or any trustee thereof
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO 12
iiwHiiinMimiiiiiiiin

Page 13 H.B. NO.
hTi
C.D. 1
may institute proceedings for the enforcement of any
agreement or any note or other undertaking,
obligation, or property securing the payment of the
bonds and the use and application of the moneys
derived therefrom.
(e) A trust indenture may also contain provisions deemed
necessary or desirable by the authority to obtain or permit, by
grant, interest subsidy, or otherwise, the participation of the
federal government in the [pubii-c] housing projects or in the
financing of the costs of administering, operating, or
maintaining the [pufeiie] housing projects."
SECTION 12. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored,
SECTION 13. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3361 HB1093 CDl HMSO

1093
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1093, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1093, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate